Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1829
Department of Correctional Services; establish and maintain farms.

The Department of Correctional Services may establish and maintain farms to provide food for the institutions under the jurisdiction of the department and also to provide opportunity for all inmates to work eight hours per day.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 29;

Laws 1980, LB 319, § 5.